Massachusetts, session 194th, S60.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 29 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following 
section:-  
Section 2RRRRR. Agriculture and Fishery Vulnerability Preparedness Grant Fund  
(a) There shall be established and set up on the books of the commonwealth a separate 
fund to be known as the Agriculture and Fishery Vulnerability Preparedness Grant Fund. The 
fund shall be administered by the secretary of energy and environmental affairs, in consultation 
with the commissioner of the department of agricultural resources and the commissioner of the 
department of fish and game. The fund shall be credited with: (i) revenue from appropriations or 
other money authorized by the general court and specifically designated to be credited to the 
fund; (ii) interest earned on such revenues; and (iii) funds from public and private sources such 
as gifts, grants and donations. Amounts credited to the fund shall not be subject to further 
appropriation and any money remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not revert to 

of 3 13 the General Fund; provided, however, that such contributions shall not be further restricted by the 
donor or used by the commonwealth for any other purpose. Any bond proceeds deposited into 
the fund shall be kept separate from any and all other funds deposited into the fund.  
(b) The public purpose of this fund shall be to administer the agriculture and fishery 
vulnerability preparedness grant program to support farms and fisheries in Massachusetts to 
engage in the process of (i) planning climate change adaptation and resiliency initiatives, (ii) 
seeking resources to support implementation, and (iii) implementing priority projects. In 
furtherance of this public purpose, the secretary, in consultation with the departments, shall 
administer the fund as grants to farms and fisheries to support controlled climate growing, 
energy efficiency, renewable energy, climate resilient management practices, nature-based 
solutions to climate impacts, infrastructure needs to support climate resilience, development and 
implementation of data collection and monitoring to measure the impact of these investments, 
and other eligible purposes as determined by the secretary and the commissioners.  
(c) Program funds may also be used to establish and provide technical assistance to 
support farms and fisheries to prioritize and submit applications, plan climate change adaptation 
and resiliency initiatives, and identify and seek funding sources to support project 
implementation.   
(d) Program funds shall be awarded to applicants from each eligible sector as categorized 
by farm or fishery proportionate to the amount of funds requested by applicants in each eligible 
sector.  
(e) The secretary shall promulgate rules and regulations for the administration and 
implementation of subsections (a) and (b). The secretary shall file any policies, rules and 

of 3 35 regulations with the joint committee on agriculture for review and comment at least 30 days 
before the effective date of the policies, rules or regulations.  
(f) The secretary shall file a quarterly report with the house and senate committees on 
ways and means, the joint committee on agriculture, and the clerks of the house and the senate 
on the following: (i) a list of grant applicants and the counties in which they are located, (ii) list 
of grant recipients and the counties in which they are located, (iii) the amount of funds requested 
by applicants, (iv) the associated grant amounts, (v) the applicant’s sector as categorized by farm 
or fishery, (vi) an annual statement detailing the sources and uses of funds, (vii) a forecast of 
future payments based on current binding obligations, and (viii) a detailed breakdown of the 
purposes and amounts of administrative costs charged to the fund. The report shall include a 
description of technical assistance services provided as part of this program.  
SECTION 2. Section 1 shall take effect immediately upon the passage of this act.